epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/en_GB.xml
	<patterns>
		.ab4i
		.ab3ol
		.ace4
		.acet3
		.ach4
		.ac5tiva
		.ad4din
		.ad3e
		.ad3o
		.ae5d
		.aer3i
		.af3f
		.af3t
		.ag4a
		.ag5n
		.air3
		.al5im
		.al1k
		.al3le
		.am5ar
		.ama5te
		.am2i
		.am3pe
		.am3ph
		.an1
		.ana3b
		.ana3s
		.and2
		.an5da
		.an4el
		.an4en
		.an4gl
		.an4on.
		.an3s
		.ant3a
		.an3ti3
		.ant4ic
		.an4t5o
		.any5
		.aph5or
		.ap4i
		.ar5ab
		.ar5ap
		.ar4ci
		.ar5d
		.ar4e
		.ari4
		.ar4ise
		.ar4isi
		.ar5sen
		.art5icl
		.as1
		.as4q
		.as5sib
		.at5ar
		.ateli4
		.at5omise
		.at5omiz
		.at3r
		.at3t
		.au3b
		.au3g4u
		.aur4e5
		.aus5
		.authen5
		.av4
		.av5era
		.bap5tism
		.barri5c
		.bas4i
		.ba5sic
		.be3di
		.be3lo
		.be5r4a
		.be5sm
		.bi4er
		.blaz5o
		.bo3lo
		.bos5om
		.boun4d
		.bov4
		.bra5ch
		.bre2
		.burn5i
		.ca3de
		.ca4gin
		.cam5i
		.cam3o
		.can1
		.can5ta
		.ca5pitu
		.car4i
		.cas5ual
		.ca4ti
		.cen5so
		.cen5tena
		.cent5ri
		.cer4i
		.ch4
		.cit4a
		.clem5e
		.clima5to
		.co5it
		.co3pa
		.cop5ro
		.co3ru
		.co3si
		.co5ter
		.cotyle5
		.cri5tici
		.custom5
		.dav5
		.dea5co
		.de5lec
		.del5eg
		.de3li
		.deli5r
		.de1m
		.de5nit
		.de3no
		.der2
		.de3ra
		.de5res
		.de3ri
		.de5scrib
		.de5serv
		.de5signe
		.de5sir
		.de5sis
		.de5spoi
		.determ5i
		.de3ve
		.de4w
		.di4al.
		.dia3s
		.di4at
		.din4a
		.dio5c
		.do2
		.do4e
		.domest5
		.du4al.
		.du4c
		.dys3
		.east5
		.echin5
		.eco3
		.ec3t
		.ed5em
		.ed4it.
		.ed4iti
		.eg4
		.ei3d
		.ei5r
		.el3ev3
		.el2i
		.elu5s
		.em3b
		.em5in
		.emp4
		.em5py
		.en1
		.en5c
		.en4ded
		.en3s
		.ent2
		.en5ta
		.eos5
		.epi1
		.epi3d
		.er2a
		.er5em5
		.er4i4
		.er4o2
		.eros4
		.erot3
		.er4ri
		.es1
		.escal5
		.es3p
		.es3t
		.etern5
		.eth3e
		.eu1
		.eur4
		.eval3
		.evol5ut
		.ew4
		.ex1
		.ex3a
		.eye3
		.fal4le
		.far4i
		.fec5unda
		.fen4d
		.feoff5
		.fi2
		.fi5lia
		.fil5tr
		.fin5ess
		.fin3g
		.fi5n4it
		.fis4c5
		.fo3c
		.fran5ch
		.fu5ga
		.ga4m
		.gam5et
		.gen4et
		.ge5neti
		.gen5ia
		.ge3ro
		.glor5io
		.gnost4
		.go3no
		.gos3
		.hab2
		.ha5bili
		.hama5
		.han4de
		.hast5i
		.he4i
		.hem5a
		.hi2
		.hi3b
		.ho2l
		.ho5rol
		.hov3
		.hy3lo
		.ico3s
		.idi2
		.ig3
		.ig1n
		.il4i
		.im5b
		.in1
		.in3d
		.in3e2
		.in2i
		.in3o
		.in3t
		.invest5i
		.ir3r
		.is4c
		.is4li
		.is4o
		.iso5m
		.ka5ro
		.ki4e
		.kin3e
		.lab4o
		.la4me
		.lam5enta
		.lan5i
		.lash4e
		.le4m
		.len5ti
		.le2p
		.lep5r
		.les5son
		.le5van
		.librar5
		.lig3a
		.li3o
		.li4ons
		.li4p
		.loc3a
		.lo4gia
		.lo2p
		.loph3
		.lous5i
		.lov5er
		.lub3
		.lyo3
		.mac5u
		.mal5ad5
		.ma5lin
		.mar5ti
		.math5
		.me5lodio
		.ment4
		.men5ta
		.me5rid
		.me5rin
		.met4er
		.mi4e
		.mi3gr
		.min5ue
		.mirk4
		.mis1
		.mi5to
		.mo3bi
		.mo5lec
		.mon3a
		.mor5ti
		.mu3ni
		.mu3si
		.musi5co
		.myth3
		.na5k
		.nari4
		.nast4
		.nas5ti
		.nec3t
		.ni4c
		.ni5tro
		.no4c
		.nom3o
		.nos3t
		.no5tic
		.nucle5
		.obed5
		.ob3el
		.ob3l
		.od4
		.oed5
		.oe5so
		.of5t
		.oi4
		.ol4d
		.ome2
		.om5el
		.on4ce
		.on4e
		.op2i
		.opt5a
		.or1
		.or4at4
		.ora5tori
		.or5che
		.or3d
		.ore4
		.or3eo
		.or4i
		.orner4
		.or2o
		.os1
		.osi4
		.oth5
		.out1
		.ov4
		.pal5i
		.para5dis
		.par5af
		.para5t
		.pa5ta
		.pa4tio
		.pec3t4
		.pecu3
		.ped3e
		.pend4
		.pen5de
		.pep3t
		.peri5n
		.perse5c
		.pe5titi
		.ph2
		.phe5nom
		.phon4i
		.pi2e
		.pi3la
		.plast4
		.plic4
		.plica4
		.plos4
		.po3la
		.po5lite
		.po2p
		.pop5l
		.po5sitio
		.pos5si
		.pro5bat
		.pur4r
		.put4te
		.ra5cem
		.ran5gi
		.re3ca
		.ref5ere
		.re5gar
		.re1i
		.re5lin
		.re1m
		.re5o
		.res5ci
		.re5sen
		.re5spo
		.re5stat
		.re5store
		.re5str
		.re3ta
		.re5u
		.re3w
		.rib5a
		.rin4
		.rit2
		.rol4la
		.ros3a
		.sa2
		.sac5r
		.sal4i
		.sa5lin
		.salt5er
		.sanc5
		.sap5a
		.sa3vo
		.sci3e
		.sea3s
		.sect4
		.sec5to
		.se3gr
		.sen3t
		.se1q
		.ser4ie
		.ses1
		.sev5era
		.sh2
		.si5gno
		.sis3
		.st4
		.stat4o
		.stra5to
		.string5i
		.su5da
		.sulph5a
		.sul3t
		.tact4i
		.tac5tic
		.ta4m
		.tamar5
		.tar5o
		.tect4
		.tel5a
		.tell5e
		.te4m
		.te5ra5t
		.ter4p
		.th4
		.tho4
		.thol4
		.ti2
		.til4
		.ti5ni
		.tit4is
		.tor1
		.tran4c
		.tri5bal
		.tri3d
		.trin4a
		.tri5sti
		.tro4ph
		.troph5o
		.tro4v
		.tular5
		.turb4
		.turi4
		.tu5te
		.tu3to
		.ul4l
		.ulti5mat
		.un5ce
		.un5ch
		.un3d2
		.under5
		.un3e
		.un3g
		.uni3c
		.uni3o
		.un3k4
		.un5s
		.un3t4
		.un5u
		.up1
		.up3l
		.ura4
		.ur5eth
		.ur4o
		.va5led
		.ve2
		.vec5
		.ve5lo
		.vent5il
		.ver4ie
		.ver3n
		.vic5to
		.vi2s
		.vis3i
		.vi5so
		.vo1c
		.vo5lut
		.wine5s
		.xy3l
		.za5r
		a4a
		1ab
		2ab.
		2aba
		ab5are
		abay4
		2abb
		ab5ber
		2abe4
		ab3erd
		ab3err
		a3bet
		ab1ic
		a3bie
		2abin
		4abio
		abi5on
		ab3ita
		ab4itu
		ab3la
		abli4
		4abolic
		ab3om
		ab3ota
		3about
		ab1r
		2abs.
		ab1ul
		abu4lo
		ab3use
		ab3usi
		2aby
		ac2a
		ac5abl
		ac3al
		5acanth
		ac5ard
		a5cat
		ach5al
		a5chini
		ach5ism
		achro4
		ach5ur
		2aci
		a4cic
		aci4ers
		acif4
		4acit
		ack5a
		ac3li
		4aco.
		aco3d
		ac5onr
		4acos
		4acou
		ac1r
		ac3ry
		act5ate
		act5ile
		ac2to
		act5ory
		ac2t5r
		ac5uat
		a5dai
		ada3v
		4adee
		ad5eni
		ad4ha
		ad3ica
		a5dif
		4adil
		adi4op
		adi4p
		adis4i
		a3diti
		3adju
		5admit
		a2do
		4adoe
		4adoi
		ad3ol
		a3dos
		ad1ow
		ad1r
		adram4
		4a2du
		ad3ula
		ad3um
		4ady
		ae5a
		ae4cit
		aeco3
		4aed
		aed5is
		ae5g
		ae3on
		ae5p
		aerody5
		ae4s
		ae5si
		aes3t
		aet4a
		aeth4
		aet4or.
		aev3a
		4af.
		4afe
		af5ta
		a4fu
		ag4ari
		4ageri
		a5ghe
		a5gia
		agi4as
		4agino
		4agl
		agli4
		4ag1n
		ag3oni
		agor4a
		ag5ot
		a2gr
		ag3ri
		agru5
		2ah
		a1h2a
		ahar2
		aha5ra
		a1he
		ah4n
		a5hoo
		2ai2
		4ai.
		ai3a
		a1ic
		aid4a
		aid5er
		aig2
		ai5gu
		ail3er
		ail3o
		aim5er
		ain5ders
		ai5nea
		a3ing.
		ain3i
		ain5o
		aint5er
		air5a
		air5p
		air3s
		ais1i
		a5ism
		2a1j
		a4ju
		2ak
		akel4
		ak5u
		al5abl
		alact4
		a1lae
		al5ais
		ala3ma
		al5ance
		al3at
		a5lav
		alc3at
		al3ch
		ald5ri
		2ale
		a3lec
		aleg4
		ale5ma
		al5ende
		a1leo
		a2let
		al3ibr
		ali4ci
		al5ics
		al1id
		al3if
		5alig
		al1in
		a5lini
		alin5o
		al5ipe
		al5ipot
		4alis.
		4aliu
		4alk
		alk5ie
		al4lab
		al4lag
		alli5an
		allig4
		al4lish
		a5loe
		al3ogr
		a3lom
		a3loo
		al1or
		al4orim
		alos4
		a4lou
		al3ous
		a5low
		al5pen
		al3ph
		al5tati
		al3tie
		alu3b
		al5ued
		al3ues
		a5lumnia
		al1va
		al5ver
		alv5u
		2a1ly4
		a5lyn
		2a2m
		a5mad
		ama4g
		aman5d
		a5marine
		a3mas.
		am1at
		a5m4atic
		am5atu
		am4bin
		3ambu
		am5elo
		a3men
		amen4d
		am3era
		am5erl
		am1i
		ami2c
		am5ica
		amic5r
		3amid
		a3mili
		am5ily
		amini4f
		am5iniz
		aminos4
		a5mis.
		a4mium.
		a3mon
		amor5a
		amort3
		am5ose
		am2p
		am5peri
		amphi5g
		amp3li
		ampo5l
		am3ul
		amyl5
		a2n
		an2a
		a5nadi
		an3ae
		an3age
		ana5k
		an3ali
		an3arc
		a5nast
		an4con
		an3d4at
		and5au
		and5eer
		an5del
		an5dif
		and5ist
		an5dit
		an4doni
		an4ea
		an5eer
		an3ell
		anel5li
		an3eu
		an3gan
		angov4
		an4gur
		4anh
		an3ic
		ani3f
		an5ifo
		4anig
		an5ion
		anis5te
		4anity
		4aniu
		an5no
		4anny
		an1o
		an2oe
		an3oma
		anor3
		an2os
		an5ot
		an2s
		an3sc
		an4sco
		ans3il
		an4sur
		an2t2a
		ant5abl
		an3tal
		an5tam
		an2te
		1anth
		an4thi
		3anthr
		4antic
		an4tie
		an4ting
		ant4iv
		an4tone
		ant4r
		an4tus
		an5tym
		an3ul
		an3um.
		an5ums
		a3nur
		a5nut
		an2y
		an5ya
		a5nyi
		2ao
		aol3i
		5aow
		2ap
		4ap.
		4apa
		a1pac
		ap3al
		ap5aro
		ape5li
		a5peu
		aph5em
		aph3i
		aph5ol
		aphyl3
		ap1i
		ap5icu
		ap3in
		ap4ine
		a5pir
		a3plan
		ap5li
		apo5str
		apo3th
		a2pr
		ap5ron
		4aps
		apt5at
		apu5lar
		a5pun
		a4q
		a5qui
		a2r
		4arabi
		ara5bo
		aract4i
		ara2g
		ar3age
		ar4aged
		ar5agi
		ar3ago
		a3raj
		ar3all
		ara3m
		aran4g
		aran5te
		ar5apa
		ar1at
		a3rau
		ara3v
		ar3ba
		arb5et
		ar4bid
		ar4bl
		arb3li
		ar4bul
		ar5chet
		arch5o
		ar5dina
		ar4done
		ar3en
		aren5d
		ar5ett
		ar3ev5
		ar5gh
		ar3gu
		ar3h
		ar1i
		ar5iff
		ar4ill
		a5ri5net
		ar5ini
		a5rishi
		arm3er
		ar5mit
		ar3nal
		ar3nis
		ar3od
		ar5oid
		aro4mas
		aro4n
		a5roti
		a5rouc
		ar3ox
		arp5ers
		ar4pu
		2arr
		ar2rh
		ar2s
		ars5al
		ar3so
		art5at
		ar2th
		arth4e
		arth3r
		ar5tiz
		2aru
		ar3um
		ar5un4
		a3ryo
		a5ryt
		ar5z
		as1a
		as4af
		asan2
		2asc
		as5con
		as5cot
		as2cr
		as2e
		as3ect
		4ased
		asep4
		ash5ay
		ash5il
		as5ily
		as3in
		a5sio
		a3sit
		as5iv
		ask5er
		aski4
		as4la
		as4lo
		2aso
		as5och
		a4soned
		as5or
		as3ph
		ass2
		assa5gi
		ass5ibl
		as4sil
		assit5
		2asta
		as4tat
		as4tia
		as3tis
		as4tit
		4asto2
		as3tra
		as4tri
		as1u
		as4un
		as5ur
		2a2ta
		4atabi
		a5talis
		atam4
		ata3p
		atar3a
		ata3s
		ata3t4
		at3eau
		at3ech
		at5eer
		a5tel.
		ate5le
		at5enat
		at3ent
		4ater
		at3era
		at5ernis
		at5erniz
		4atess
		at5et
		4a2th
		ath3a
		a3then
		ath5erin
		ath5ero
		ath5ete
		ath3i
		ath3od
		a5thon
		ath5r
		4a3tia
		ati2c
		at5icis
		ati5cit
		at5iciz
		a2tif
		a4t1i4l
		a4tim
		a2t3in
		4atina
		at5ing
		4at4is.
		at1it
		atit3u
		atitud5i
		4atiu
		at4ivi
		a5tiviz
		a2to
		5at5od
		4atog
		2atol
		4aton
		a3too
		a4tops
		a5torian
		a4tory
		atos4
		a5toz
		2a2tr
		at3ra
		a4tre
		5at5ress
		at1ri
		atric5u
		at3ron
		at5rou
		at4tag
		2a2tu
		at1ul
		atu4m
		at3ura
		at3urg
		4a2ty
		2au2
		4au.
		aub5i
		4auc
		au5cer
		auc3o
		aud5er
		audic4
		aul3i
		aul4t
		aul5ted
		ault5er
		ault5i
		au3ma
		aun2
		aun5chie
		aun3d
		aun4dre
		au5reo
		aur4o
		au5ror
		4aus.
		aus5er
		aus5p
		aus4ted
		aut3ar
		aut3er
		au3th
		2av
		av4ab
		ava4g
		av3age
		ava5la
		av5alr
		av5ant
		av5ar
		avas3
		av3end
		av3ern
		av3ig
		aviol4
		av1is
		aw5er.
		aw5ers
		aw1i
		aw5nie
		aw5y
		a4x
		ax2id
		4ay
		ay5la
		ay3m
		ayn4
		ays2
		ay5si
		ay5sta
		ayth4
		2az2
		az3ar
		aze4
		az5ee
		azyg4
		azz4l
		2ba.
		ba5bir
		3back
		baen4
		bag4a
		5bah
		ba4i
		bal3a
		balm5i
		ba5lon
		bal5u
		bam4a
		ban4a
		ba5nan
		b4ane
		5bang
		b4aniti
		b4ans
		ba4p1
		5barb
		bar4d
		bardi4
		bar4n
		ba5rom
		bar3on
		5bars
		1bas
		bas4te
		ba4th4
		3batic
		ba5tio
		bat5on
		battle5
		2b1b2
		b4bata
		b3bli
		b4bone
		b1c2
		bcord4
		2b1d
		bdeac5
		bde4b
		bdi4v
		b2e
		4be.
		3bea
		4beas
		be3ca
		3becu
		2bed
		be3da
		bed5el
		bed2i
		be4do
		be5dra
		be4du
		5bee
		3bef
		be3go
		be5gr
		be3gu
		1bel
		be3la
		2bele
		be3lit
		bel4t
		be3m
		ben4d
		bend5a
		bend5er
		be1ne
		be5nig
		be5nu
		4beo
		be3q
		2bere
		berga5m
		berl4
		5berr
		ber5s
		b5ertin
		be1s2
		2bes.
		be3sl
		be3tr
		be3w
		2b1f
		bfa4
		4b1h
		b4ha
		2bi.
		1bia
		bi4b1
		bicen5
		3b2id
		bid5i
		b4ie
		bi4ers
		bif4
		bi4fid.
		bi5ga
		bigu3
		b1il
		b2ile
		5biles
		3b2ill
		4bim
		bimet5
		5bina
		5bin4d
		bind3e
		bin5et
		bin5i4
		1bi2o
		bio3l
		bio5m
		bi3ou
		bip4
		bi5q
		bir4
		bi3re4
		bi5rus
		b2is
		5bism
		bis4o
		bisul5
		3bitua
		4bity
		bi5ve
		b1j
		4b5k4
		2bl2
		5blac
		blag4
		b3lan
		5blast
		bla5tu
		blem5at
		3bler
		5blesp
		4blik
		blim3a
		bli3o
		bli2q
		b3lis
		4bly
		2b1m
		bment4
		bmi4
		4b1n
		bo2
		4bo.
		3boa
		bo5am
		5bob
		bod5i
		bo5h
		2boid
		4boke
		bol4e
		4boled
		bol3i
		bol4t
		3bon
		bon4c
		bon4e
		bon4ie
		boni4f
		bon4sp
		1boo
		b3orat
		bor3d
		bor5ee
		bor5et
		3bori
		bor5ic
		bor5io
		bor4n
		bot3an
		5boti
		boun5ti
		3bour
		bous4
		bow2
		bow3s
		4boxy
		5boy
		br4
		3brach
		4bral
		bram4
		b2ran
		bran4d
		4bre.
		b4reas
		4b2res
		brev5et
		b2rid
		5brief
		bring5
		bri4os
		b5rist
		b4roa
		bro4ma
		bros4
		brum4
		4bry.
		4b1s2
		b3sc
		bscon4
		bsen4
		bserv5an
		b5si
		bsin4
		bso2
		bsol3e
		bso3lu
		b4stac
		bstupe5
		2b1t
		b5tlet
		4bu.
		5bub
		buf5fer
		b4uli
		b4ulos
		bun2
		bun4a
		b5u5nat
		bunt4
		bur3e
		bur4ri
		busi4e
		buss2
		bus5si
		3bust
		bu5tar
		b3ute
		b5utin
		3butio
		but4iv
		b5ut5o
		b1v
		4b3w
		2by
		4by.
		3byi
		bys4
		5byt
		2ca.
		cab5in
		c4ace
		caco3
		cad4r
		5caf
		ca3go
		5cai
		5cak
		c1al
		c4ala
		ca5laman
		cal5ar
		3calc
		ca5lef
		call5in
		cal4m
		ca3ly
		ca3ma
		cam4i
		ca5nar
		c2an4e
		c4ano
		ca3noe
		can5tar
		can5ted
		can4tic
		can4tr
		5cao
		1cap
		ca5pil
